California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 18.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.011.

Every person who is required to register pursuant to the act who is living as a transient shall be required to register for the rest of his or her life as follows:

(a) He or she shall register, or reregister if the person has previously registered, within five working days from release from incarceration, placement or commitment, or release on probation, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 290, except that if the person previously registered as a transient less than 30 days from the date of his or her release from incarceration, he or she does not need to reregister as a transient until his or her next required 30-day update of registration. If a transient convicted in another jurisdiction enters the state, he or she shall register within
 five working days of coming into California with the chief of police of the city in which he or she is present or the sheriff of the county if he or she is present in an unincorporated area or city that has no police department. If a transient is not physically present in any one jurisdiction for five consecutive working days, he or she shall register in the jurisdiction in which he or she is physically present on the fifth working day following release, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 290. Beginning on or before the 30th day following initial registration upon release, a transient shall reregister no less than once every 30 days thereafter. A transient shall register with the chief of police of the city in which he or she is physically present within that 30-day period, or the sheriff of the county if he or she is physically present in an unincorporated area or city that has no police department, and additionally, with the chief of police of a campus of the University of California, the California
 State University, or community college if he or she is physically present upon the campus or in any of its facilities. A transient shall reregister no less than once every 30 days regardless of the length of time he or she has been physically present in the particular jurisdiction in which he or she reregisters. If a transient fails to reregister within any 30-day period, he or she may be prosecuted in any jurisdiction in which he or she is physically present.

(b) A transient who moves to a residence shall have five working days within which to register at that address, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 290. A person registered at a residence address in accordance with that provision who becomes transient shall have five working days within which to reregister as a transient in accordance with subdivision (a).

(c) Beginning on his or her first birthday following
 registration, a transient shall register annually, within five working days of his or her birthday, to update his or her registration with the entities described in subdivision (a). A transient shall register in whichever jurisdiction he or she is physically present on that date. At the 30-day updates and the annual update, a transient shall provide current information as required on the Department of Justice annual update form, including the information described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 290.015, and the information specified in subdivision (d).

(d) A transient shall, upon registration and reregistration, provide current information as required on the Department of Justice registration forms, and shall also list the places where he or she sleeps, eats, works, frequents, and engages in leisure activities. If a transient changes or adds to the places listed on the form during the 30-day period, he or she
 does not need to report the new place or places until the next required reregistration.

(e) Failure to comply with the requirement of reregistering every 30 days following initial registration pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be punished in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 290.018. Failure to comply with any other requirement of this section shall be punished in accordance with either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 290.018.

(f) A transient who moves out of state shall inform, in person, the chief of police in the city in which he or she is physically present, or the sheriff of the county if he or she is physically present in an unincorporated area or city that has no police department, within five working days, of his or her move out of state. The transient shall inform that registering agency of his or her planned destination, residence or transient location out of
 state, and any plans he or she has to return to California, if known. The law enforcement agency shall, within three days after receipt of this information, forward a copy of the change of location information to the Department of Justice. The department shall forward appropriate registration data to the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the new place of residence or location.

(g) For purposes of the act, “transient” means a person who has no residence. “Residence” means one or more addresses at which a person regularly resides, regardless of the number of days or nights spent there, such as a shelter or structure that can be located by a street address, including, but not limited to, houses, apartment buildings, motels, hotels, homeless shelters, and recreational and other vehicles.

(h) The transient registrant’s duty to update his or her registration no less
 than every 30 days shall begin with his or her second transient update following the date this section became effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 153.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

290.012.

(a) Beginning on his or her first birthday following registration or change of address, the person shall be required to register annually, within five working days of his or her birthday, to update his or her registration with the entities described in subdivision (b) of Section 290. At the annual update, the person shall provide current information as required on the Department of Justice annual update form, including the information described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 290.015. The registering agency shall give the registrant a copy of the registration requirements from the Department of Justice form.

(b) In addition, every person who has
 ever been adjudicated a sexually violent predator, as defined in Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall, after his or her release from custody, verify his or her address no less than once every 90 days and place of employment, including the name and address of the employer, in a manner established by the Department of Justice. Every person who, as a sexually violent predator, is required to verify his or her registration every 90 days, shall be notified wherever he or she next registers of his or her increased registration obligations. This notice shall be provided in writing by the registering agency or agencies. Failure to receive this notice shall be a defense to the penalties prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 290.018.

(c) In addition, every person subject to the Act, while living as a transient in California, shall
 update his or her registration at least every 30 days, in accordance with Section 290.011.

(d) No entity shall require a person to pay a fee to register or update his or her registration pursuant to this section. The registering agency shall submit registrations, including annual updates or changes of address, directly into the Department of Justice California Sex and Arson Registry (CSAR).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2012, by initiative Prop. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

290.013.

(a) A person who was last registered at a residence address pursuant to the Act who changes his or her residence address, whether within the jurisdiction in which he or she is currently registered or to a new jurisdiction inside or outside the state, shall, in person, within five working days of the move, inform the law enforcement agency or agencies with which he or she last registered of the move, the new address or transient location, if known, and any plans he or she has to return to California.

(b) If the person does not know the new residence address or location at the time of the move, the registrant shall, in person, within five working days of the move, inform the last registering agency or agencies that he or she is moving. The person shall later notify the last registering agency or agencies, in writing, sent by certified or registered mail, of the new address or location within five working days of moving into the new residence address or location, whether temporary or permanent.

(c) The law enforcement agency or agencies shall, within three working days after receipt of this information, forward a copy of the change of address information to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall forward appropriate registration data to the law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction of the
 new place of residence.

(d) If the person is being admitted to or released from a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation facility, a county or local custodial facility, or state mental institution, an official of the place of incarceration, placement, or commitment shall, within 15 working days of both receipt and release of the person, forward the registrant’s change of address information to the Department of Justice in a manner prescribed by the department. If the person is being admitted to the facility, the agency need not provide a physical address for the registrant but shall indicate that he or she is serving a period of incarceration or commitment in a facility under the agency’s jurisdiction. This subdivision shall apply to persons received in a department facility, county or local custodial facility, or state mental institution
 on or after January 1, 1999. The Department of Justice shall forward the change of address information to the agency with which the person last registered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   (AB 1994)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

290.014.

(a) If any person who is required to register pursuant to the Act changes his or her name, the person shall inform, in person, the law enforcement agency or agencies with which he or she is currently registered within five working days. The law enforcement agency or agencies shall forward a copy of this information to the Department of Justice within three working days of its receipt.

(b) If any person who is required to register Internet identifiers pursuant to Section 290.024 adds or changes an Internet identifier, as defined in Section 290.024, the person shall send written notice by mail of the addition or change to the law enforcement agency or agencies with which he or she
 is currently registered within 30 working days of the addition or change. The law enforcement agency or agencies shall make the information available to the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2012, by initiative Prop. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

290.015.

(a) A person who is subject to the Act shall register, or reregister if he or she has previously registered, upon release from incarceration, placement, commitment, or release on probation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 290. This section shall not apply to a person who is incarcerated for less than 30 days if he or she has registered as required by the Act, he or she returns after incarceration to the last registered address, and the annual update of registration that is required to occur within five working days of his or her birthday, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 290.012, did not fall within that incarceration period. The registration shall consist of all of the following:

(1) A statement in writing signed by the person, giving information as shall be required by the Department of Justice and giving the name and address of the person’s employer, and the address of the person’s place of employment if that is different from the employer’s main address.

(2) The fingerprints and a current photograph of the person taken by the registering official.

(3) The license plate number of any vehicle owned by, regularly driven by, or registered in the name of the person.

(4) A list of all Internet identifiers actually used by the person, as required by Section 290.024.

(5) A statement in writing, signed by the person, acknowledging that
 the person is required to register and update the information in paragraph (4), as required by this chapter.

(6) Notice to the person that, in addition to the requirements of the Act, he or she may have a duty to register in any other state where he or she may relocate.

(7) Copies of adequate proof of residence, which shall be limited to a California driver’s license, California identification card, recent rent or utility receipt, printed personalized checks or other recent banking documents showing that person’s name and address, or any other information that the registering official believes is reliable. If the person has no residence and no reasonable expectation of obtaining a residence in the foreseeable future, the person shall so advise the registering official and shall sign a statement
 provided by the registering official stating that fact. Upon presentation of proof of residence to the registering official or a signed statement that the person has no residence, the person shall be allowed to register. If the person claims that he or she has a residence but does not have any proof of residence, he or she shall be allowed to register but shall furnish proof of residence within 30 days of the date he or she is allowed to register.

(b) Within three days thereafter, the registering law enforcement agency or agencies shall forward the statement, fingerprints, photograph, and vehicle license plate number, if any, to the Department of Justice.

(c) (1) If a person fails to register in accordance with subdivision (a) after release, the district attorney
 in the jurisdiction where the person was to be paroled or to be on probation may request that a warrant be issued for the person’s arrest and shall have the authority to prosecute that person pursuant to Section 290.018.

(2) If the person was not on parole or probation or on postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision at the time of release, the district attorney in the following applicable jurisdiction shall have the authority to prosecute that person pursuant to Section 290.018:

(A) If the person was previously registered, in the jurisdiction in which the person last registered.

(B) If there is no prior registration, but the person indicated on the Department of Justice notice of sex offender
 registration requirement form where he or she expected to reside, in the jurisdiction where he or she expected to reside.

(C) If neither subparagraph (A) nor (B) applies, in the jurisdiction where the offense subjecting the person to registration pursuant to this Act was committed.

(History: Amended (as amended Nov. 6, 2012, by Prop. 35) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 772, Sec. 4.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2012, by initiative Prop. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

290.016.

(a) On or after January 1, 1998, upon incarceration, placement, or commitment, or prior to release on probation, any person who is required to register under the Act shall preregister. The preregistering official shall be the admitting officer at the place of incarceration, placement, or commitment, or the probation officer if the person is to be released on probation. The preregistration shall consist of all of the following:

(1) A preregistration statement in writing, signed by the person, giving information that shall be required by the Department of Justice.

(2) The fingerprints and a current photograph of the person.

(3) Any person who is preregistered pursuant to this subdivision is required to be preregistered only once.

(b) Within three days thereafter, the preregistering official shall forward the statement, fingerprints, photograph, and vehicle license plate number, if any, to the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 24.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.017.

(a) Any person who is released, discharged, or paroled from a jail, state or federal prison, school, road camp, or other institution where he or she was confined, who is required to register pursuant to the Act, shall, prior to discharge, parole, or release, be informed of his or her duty to register under the Act by the official in charge of the place of confinement or hospital, and the official shall require the person to read and sign any form that may be required by the Department of Justice, stating that the duty of the person to register under the Act has been explained to the person. The official in charge of the place of confinement or hospital shall obtain the address where the person expects to reside upon his or her discharge, parole, or release and shall report the address to the Department of Justice. The official shall at the same time forward a current photograph of the person to the Department of Justice.

(b) The official in charge of the place of confinement or hospital shall give one copy of the form to the person and shall send one copy to the Department of Justice and one copy to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having jurisdiction over the place the person expects to reside upon discharge, parole, or release. If the conviction that makes the person subject to the Act is a felony conviction, the official in charge shall, not later than 45 days prior to the scheduled release of the person, send one copy to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction where the person expects to reside upon discharge, parole, or release; one copy to the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the person; and one copy to the Department of Justice. The official in charge of the place of confinement or hospital shall retain one copy.

(c) Any person who is required to register pursuant to the Act and who is released on probation, shall, prior to release or discharge, be informed of the duty to register under the Act by the probation department, and a probation officer shall require the person to read and sign any form that may be required by the Department of Justice, stating that the duty of the person to register has been explained to him or her. The probation officer shall obtain the address where the person expects to reside upon release or discharge and shall report within three days the address to the Department of Justice. The probation officer shall give one copy of the form to the person, send one copy to the Department of Justice, and forward one copy to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction where the person expects to reside upon his or her discharge, parole, or release.

(d) Any person who is required to register pursuant to the Act and who is granted conditional release without supervised probation, or discharged upon payment of a fine, shall, prior to release or discharge, be informed of the duty to register under the Act in open court by the court in which the person has been convicted, and the court shall require the person to read and sign any form that may be required by the Department of Justice, stating that the duty of the person to register has been explained to him or her. If the court finds that it is in the interest of the efficiency of the court, the court may assign the bailiff to require the person to read and sign forms under the Act. The court shall obtain the address where the person expects to reside upon release or discharge and shall report within three days the address to the Department of Justice. The court shall give one copy of the form to the person, send one copy to the Department of Justice, and forward one copy to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction where the person expects to reside upon his or her discharge, parole, or release.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 25.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.018.

(a) A person who is required to register under the Act based on a misdemeanor conviction or juvenile adjudication who willfully violates any requirement of the act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (f), (h), (i), and (k), a person who
 is required to register under the act based on a felony conviction or juvenile adjudication who willfully violates any requirement of the act or who has a prior conviction or juvenile adjudication for the offense of failing to register under the act and who subsequently and willfully violates any requirement of the act is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(c) If probation is granted or if the imposition or execution of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition of the probation or suspension that the person serve at least 90 days in a county jail. The penalty described in subdivision (b) or this subdivision shall apply whether or not the person has been released on parole or has been discharged from parole.

(d) A person determined to be a mentally disordered sex offender or who has been found guilty in the guilt phase of trial for an offense for which registration is required under the act, but who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity in the sanity phase of the trial, or who has had a petition sustained in a juvenile adjudication for an offense for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290.008, but who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity, who willfully violates any requirement of the act is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year. For any second or subsequent willful violation of any requirement of the act, the person is
 guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(e) If, after discharge from parole, the person is convicted of a felony or suffers a juvenile adjudication as specified in this act, he or she shall be required to complete parole of at least one year, in addition to any other punishment imposed under this section. A person convicted of a felony as specified in this section may be granted probation only in the unusual case where the interests of justice would best be served. When probation is granted under this act, the court shall specify on the record and shall enter into the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by the disposition.

(f) A
 person who has ever been adjudicated a sexually violent predator, as defined in Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and who fails to verify his or her registration every 90 days as required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 290.012, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison or in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), a person who is required to register or reregister pursuant to Section 290.011 and willfully fails to comply with the requirement that he or she reregister no less than every 30 days is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment
 in a county jail for at least 30 days, but not exceeding six months. A person who willfully fails to comply with the requirement that he or she reregister no less than every 30 days shall not be charged with this violation more often than once for a failure to register in any period of 90 days. A person who willfully commits a third or subsequent violation of the requirements of Section 290.011 that he or she reregister no less than every 30 days shall be punished in accordance with either subdivision (a) or (b).

(h) A person
 who fails to provide proof of residence as required by paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 290.015, regardless of the offense upon which the duty to register is based, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months.

(i) A person who fails to provide his or her Internet identifiers, as required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 290.015, regardless of the offense upon which the duty to register is based, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable in a county jail not exceeding six months.

(j) A
 person who is required to register under the act who willfully violates any requirement of the act is guilty of a continuing offense as to each requirement he or she violated.

(k) In addition to any other penalty imposed under this section, the failure to provide information required on registration and reregistration forms of the Department of Justice, or the provision of false information, is a crime punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding one year. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit or prevent prosecution under any applicable
 law.

(l) Whenever a person is released on parole or probation and is required to register under the act but fails to do so within the time prescribed, the parole authority or the court, as the case may be, shall order the parole or probation of the person revoked. For purposes of this subdivision, “parole authority” has the same meaning as described in Section 3000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 772, Sec. 6.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

290.019.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section in the Act, a person who was convicted before January 1, 1976, under subdivision (a) of Section 286, or former Section 288a, shall not be required to register pursuant to the Act for that conviction if the conviction was for conduct between consenting adults that was decriminalized by Chapter 71 of the Statutes of 1975 or Chapter 1139 of the Statutes of 1976. The Department of Justice shall remove that person from the California Sex Offender Registry, and the person is discharged from the person’s duty to register pursuant to either of the following procedures:

(1) The person submits to the Department of Justice official documentary evidence, including court records or police reports, that demonstrate that the person’s
 conviction pursuant to either of those sections was for conduct between consenting adults that was decriminalized.

(2) The person submits to the department a declaration stating that the person’s conviction pursuant to either of those sections was for consensual conduct between adults that has been decriminalized. The declaration shall be confidential and not a public record, and shall include the person’s name, address, telephone number, date of birth, and a summary of the circumstances leading to the conviction, including the date of the conviction and county of the occurrence.

(b) The department shall determine whether the person’s conviction was for conduct between consensual adults that has been decriminalized. If the conviction was for consensual conduct between adults that has been decriminalized, and the person has no other offenses for which the person is required to
 register pursuant to the Act, the department shall, within 60 days of receipt of those documents, notify the person that the person is relieved of the duty to register, and shall notify the local law enforcement agency with which the person is registered that the person has been relieved of the duty to register. The local law enforcement agency shall remove the person’s registration from its files within 30 days of receipt of notification. If the documentary or other evidence submitted is insufficient to establish the person’s claim, the department shall, within 60 days of receipt of those documents, notify the person that the person’s claim cannot be established, and that the person shall continue to register pursuant to the Act. The department shall provide, upon the person’s request, any information relied upon by the department in making its determination that the person shall continue to register pursuant to the Act. Any person whose claim has been denied by the department pursuant to this subdivision
 may petition the court to appeal the department’s denial of the person’s claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 193.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

290.020.

In any case in which a person who would be required to register pursuant to the Act for a felony conviction is to be temporarily sent outside the institution where he or she is confined on any assignment within a city or county including firefighting, disaster control, or of whatever nature the assignment may be, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the place or places where the assignment shall occur shall be notified within a reasonable time prior to removal from the institution. This section shall not apply to any person who is temporarily released under guard from the institution where he or she is confined.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 28.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.021.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the statements, photographs, and fingerprints required by the Act shall not be open to inspection by the public or by any person other than a regularly employed peace officer or other law enforcement officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 29.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.022.

On or before July 1, 2010, the Department of Justice shall renovate the VCIN to do the following:

(1) Correct all software deficiencies affecting data integrity and include designated data fields for all mandated sex offender data.

(2) Consolidate and simplify program logic, thereby increasing system performance and reducing system maintenance costs.

(3) Provide all necessary data storage, processing, and search capabilities.

(4) Provide law enforcement agencies with full Internet access to all sex offender data and photos.

(5) Incorporate a flexible design structure to readily meet future demands for enhanced system functionality, including public Internet access to sex offender information pursuant to Section 290.46.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 30.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.023.

The registration provisions of the Act are applicable to every person described in the Act, without regard to when his or her crime or crimes were committed or his or her duty to register pursuant to the Act arose, and to every offense described in the Act, regardless of when it was committed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 31.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

290.024.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) A person who is convicted of a felony on or after January 1, 2017, requiring registration pursuant to the Act, shall register his or her Internet identifiers if a court determines at the time of sentencing that any of the following apply:

(1) The person used the Internet to collect any private information to identify the victim of the crime to further the commission of the crime.

(2) The person was convicted of a felony pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 236.1 and used the Internet to traffic the victim of the crime.

(3) The person was convicted of a felony pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311) and used the Internet to prepare, publish, distribute, send, exchange, or download the obscene matter or matter depicting a minor engaging in sexual conduct, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 311.4.

(b) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Internet identifier” means any electronic mail address or user name used for instant messaging or social networking that is actually used for direct communication between users on the Internet in a manner that makes the communication not accessible to the general public. “Internet identifier” does not include Internet passwords, date of birth, social security number, or PIN number.

(2) “Private information” means any information that identifies or describes an individual, including, but not limited to, his or her name; electronic mail, chat, instant messenger, social networking, or similar name used for Internet communication; social security number; account numbers; passwords; personal identification numbers; physical description; physical location; home address; home telephone number; education; financial matters; medical or employment history; and statements made by, or attributed to, the individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 772, Sec. 7.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 6, 2012, by initiative Prop. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

290.01.

(a) (1) Commencing October 28, 2002, every person required to register pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.009, inclusive, of the Sex Offender Registration Act who is enrolled as a student of any university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning, or is, with or without compensation, a full-time or part-time employee of that university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning, or is carrying on a vocation at the university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning, for more than 14 days, or for an aggregate period exceeding 30 days in a calendar year, shall, in addition to the registration required by the Sex Offender Registration Act, register with the campus police department within five working days of commencing enrollment or employment at that university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning, on a form as may be required by the Department of Justice. The terms “employed or carries on a vocation” include employment whether or not financially compensated, volunteered, or performed for government or educational benefit. The registrant shall also notify the campus police department within five working days of ceasing to be enrolled or employed, or ceasing to carry on a vocation, at the university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning.

(2) For purposes of this section, a campus police department is a police department of the University of California, California State University, or California Community College, established pursuant to Section 72330, 89560, or 92600 of the Education Code, or is a police department staffed with deputized or appointed personnel with peace officer status as provided in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code and is the law enforcement agency with the primary responsibility for investigating crimes occurring on the college or university campus on which it is located.

(b) If the university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning has no campus police department, the registrant shall instead register pursuant to subdivision (a) with the police of the city in which the campus is located or the sheriff of the county in which the campus is located if the campus is located in an unincorporated area or in a city that has no police department, on a form as may be required by the Department of Justice. The requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) are in addition to the requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act.

(c) A first violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). A second violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A third or subsequent violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(d) (1) (A) The following information regarding a registered sex offender on campus as to whom information shall not be made available to the public via the Internet Web site as provided in Section 290.46 may be released to members of the campus community by any campus police department or, if the university, college, community college, or other institution of higher learning has no police department, the police department or sheriff’s department with jurisdiction over the campus, and any employees of those agencies, as required by Section 1092(f)(1)(I) of Title 20 of the United States Code:

(i) The offender’s full name.

(ii) The offender’s known aliases.

(iii) The offender’s gender.

(iv) The offender’s race.

(v) The offender’s physical description.

(vi) The offender’s photograph.

(vii) The offender’s date of birth.

(viii) Crimes resulting in registration under Section 290.

(ix) The date of last registration or reregistration.

(B) The authority provided in this subdivision is in addition to the authority of a peace officer or law enforcement agency to provide information about a registered sex offender pursuant to Section 290.45, and exists notwithstanding Section 290.021 or any other provision of law.

(2) Any law enforcement entity and employees of any law enforcement entity listed in paragraph (1) shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for good faith conduct under this subdivision.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize campus police departments or, if the university, college, community college, or other institution has no police department, the police department or sheriff’s department with jurisdiction over the campus, to make disclosures about registrants intended to reach persons beyond the campus community.

(4) (A) Before being provided any information by an agency pursuant to this subdivision, a member of the campus community who requests that information shall sign a statement, on a form provided by the Department of Justice, stating that he or she is not a registered sex offender, that he or she understands the purpose of the release of information is to allow members of the campus community to protect themselves and their children from sex offenders, and that he or she understands it is unlawful to use information obtained pursuant to this subdivision to commit a crime against any registrant or to engage in illegal discrimination or harassment of any registrant. The signed statement shall be maintained in a file in the agency’s office for a minimum of five years.

(B) An agency disseminating printed information pursuant to this subdivision shall maintain records of the means and dates of dissemination for a minimum of five years.
